Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1143.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-120.08, to read: START_STATUTE15-120.08. United States department of education office for civil rights; compliance reports; school report card Each public school and each local education agency shall: 1. Submit to the department the most recent information that the public school or local education agency reported to the United States department of education office for civil rights for the purposes of the civil rights data collection survey. 2. Include a statement in the school report card required by section 15-746 that indicates whether the school or local education agency complied with paragraph 1 of this section. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 15, chapter 2, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-249.20, to read: START_STATUTE15-249.20. School safety report; required information; posting A. On or before December 15 of each year, the department of education shall submit a school safety report to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and provide a copy of the report to the secretary of state. The report shall contain the following information, as reported to the United States department of education office for civil rights for the purposes of the civil rights data collection survey: 1. The number of school safety incidents. 2. The number of referrals to law enforcement. 3. Data regarding the school climate. B. The department shall collect information for the report required by subsection a of this section from publicly available sources and the most recent information that each public school reported to the United States department of education office for civil rights and submitted to the department pursuant to section 15-120.08. C. The department shall post the report on the department's website in a format that is accessible to the public. END_STATUTE